en: Paintball feed system: Dual feed; Gravity hopper; Hopper fed; Magazine fed; Motorized loader; Other
cs: Systém podávání paintballových kuliček: Dvojité podávání; Gravitační zásobník (hopper); Zásobník vrchní (hopper); Zásobník spodní (magazine); Motorizovaný podavač; Jiné
th: ระบบป้อนลูกเพนท์บอล: ระบบป้อนลูกคู่; โหลดเดอร์แบบใช้แรงโน้มถ่วง; แบบใช้โหลดเดอร์; แบบใช้แมกกาซีน; โหลดเดอร์ติดมอเตอร์; อื่นๆ
hu: Paintball-adagolórendszer: Kettős adagolás; Gravitációs tár; Tár adagolású; Tárbetétes adagolású; Motoros adagoló; Egyéb
bg-BG: Система за подаване на пейнтбол: Двойно подаване; Гравитационен хопер; С хопер; С пълнител; Моторизиран зареждащ механизъм; Друго
fr: Système d’alimentation en billes de paintball: Double alimentation; Réservoir par gravité; Alimentation par réservoir; Alimentation par chargeur; Chargeur motorisé; Autre
tr: Paintball besleme sistemi: Çift beslemeli; Yer çekimi beslemeli hazne; Hazne beslemeli; Şarjör beslemeli; Motorlu yükleyici; Diğer
nb: Paintball-matesystem: Dobbel mating; Tyngdekraftmagasin; Magasinmatet (Hopper); Magasinmatet; Motorisert mater; Annet
de: Paintball-Zuführungssystem: Dual-Feed; Schwerkraft-Hopper; Hopper-Zuführung; Magazin-Zuführung; Motorisierter Loader; Sonstige
sv: Paintballmatningssystem: Dubbel matning; Gravitationsmagasin; Hoppermatad; Magasinmatad; Motoriserad laddare; Övrigt
ja: ペイントボール供給システム: デュアルフィード; グラビティホッパー; ホッパー給弾; マガジン給弾; 電動ローダー; その他
ko: 페인트볼 공급 시스템: 듀얼 피드; 중력 호퍼; 호퍼 피드; 매거진 피드; 전동 로더; 기타
lt-LT: Dažasvydžio padavimo sistema: Dvigubas tiekimas; Gravitacinė dėtuvė; Tiekimas iš dėtuvės; Tiekimas iš apkabos; Motorizuotas tiekiklis; Kita
hr-HR: Sustav za dopremanje municije u paintballu: Dvostruko punjenje; Gravitacijski spremnik; Punjenje preko spremnika; Punjenje preko okvira; Motorizirani punjač; Ostalo
da: Indføringssystem til paintball: Dobbelt fremføring; Tyngdekraft-magasin; Magasinfremføring; Magasinfremføring; Motoriseret fremfører; Andet
sl-SI: Sistem podajanja paintball kroglic: Dvojno podajanje; Gravitacijski zalogovnik; Zalogovniško podajanje; Podajanje iz nabojnika; Motorizirani polnilnik; Drugo
zh-CN: 彩弹供弹系统: 双路供弹; 重力料斗; 料斗供弹; 弹匣供弹; 电动装弹器; 其他
sk-SK: Systém podávania pri paintbale: Duálne podávanie; Gravitačný zásobník; Zo zásobníka; Z klasického zásobníka (magazine); Motorizovaný podávač; Iné
pl: System podawania kulek paintballowych: Podwójne zasilanie; Magazynek grawitacyjny; Zasilanie z magazynka (hoppera); Zasilanie z magazynka (standardowego); Ładowarka elektryczna; Inne
pt-BR: Sistema de alimentação de paintballs: Alimentação dupla; Alimentador por gravidade; Alimentação por hopper; Alimentação por carregador; Alimentador motorizado; Outro
it: Sistema di alimentazione per paintball: Doppia alimentazione; Caricatore a gravità; Alimentazione a tramoggia; Alimentazione a caricatore; Caricatore motorizzato; Altro
pt-PT: Sistema de alimentação de paintball: Alimentação dupla; Tremonha de gravidade; Alimentação por tremonha; Alimentação por carregador; Carregador motorizado; Outro
es: Sistema de alimentación de bolas de pintura: Alimentación doble; Tolva de gravedad; Alimentado por tolva; Alimentado por cargador; Cargador motorizado; Otro
nl: Paintball toevoersysteem: Dual feed; Zwaartekrachthopper; Met hopper; Met magazijn; Gemotoriseerde lader; Overig
el: Σύστημα τροφοδοσίας paintball: Διπλή τροφοδοσία; Γεμιστήρας βαρύτητας; Τροφοδοσία μέσω γεμιστήρα; Τροφοδοσία μέσω magazine; Μηχανοκίνητος φορτωτής; Άλλο
vi: Hệ thống nạp đạn paintball: Nạp kép; Nạp đạn bằng trọng lực; Nạp bằng phễu; Nạp bằng hộp tiếp đạn; Bộ nạp đạn có động cơ; Khác
zh-TW: 彩彈供彈系統: 雙饋彈; 重力彈斗; 彈斗饋彈; 彈匣饋彈; 電動裝彈機; 其他
ro-RO: Sistemul de alimentare al markerului de paintball: Alimentare dublă; Rezervor gravitațional; Alimentare cu rezervor; Alimentare cu încărcător; Încărcător motorizat; Altele
ru: Система подачи пейнтбольных шаров: Двойная подача; Гравитационный фидер; Фидерная подача; Магазинная подача; Моторизованный фидер; Другое
fi: Paintball-syöttöjärjestelmä: Kaksoissyöttö; Painovoimasyöttö; Säiliösyöttöinen; Lipassyöttöinen; Moottoroitu syötin; Muu